Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE
7.

SUPPORT
PROCEEDING UNDER CONVENTION

Note

Article heading amended by L 2015, c 77, pt of §1.

§576B-701 Definitions. As used
in this article unless the context otherwise requires:

"Application" means a request under
the Convention by an obligee or obligor, or on behalf of a child, made through
a central authority for assistance from another central authority.

"Central authority" means the entity
designated by the United States or a foreign country described in paragraph (4)
of the definition of "foreign country" in section 576B-102 to perform
the functions specified in the Convention.

"Convention support order" means a
support order of a tribunal of a foreign country described in paragraph (4) of
the definition of "foreign country" in section 576B-102.

"Direct request" means a petition
filed by an individual in a tribunal of this State in a proceeding involving an
obligee, obligor, or child residing outside the United States.

"Foreign central authority" means the
entity designated by a foreign country described in paragraph (4) of the
definition of "foreign country" in section 576B-102 to perform the
functions specified in the Convention.

"Foreign support agreement":

(1) Means an agreement for support in a record that:

(A) Is enforceable as a support order in the
country of origin;

(B) Has been:

(i) Formally drawn up or registered as an
authentic instrument by a foreign tribunal; or

(ii) Authenticated by, or concluded,
registered, or filed with a foreign tribunal; and

(C) May be reviewed and modified by a foreign
tribunal; and

(2) Includes a maintenance arrangement or authentic
instrument under the Convention.

"United States central authority"
means the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services. [L 1997, c 295, pt of §1; am L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next